Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.350

Application of RCW 24.06.100 and 24.06.105.

The provisions of RCW 24.06.100 and 24.06.105 shall apply to every association subject to this chapter.

[ 1989 c 307 s 20.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.